Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2701.41
Taxpayer, defined.

Taxpayer means any person subject to a tax imposed by sections 77-2701 to 77-2713.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 77-2702.22;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 45;

Laws 2021, LB26, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB595, § 5;

Laws 2022, LB984, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 61;

Laws 2024, LB937, § 69.